Arkansas, session 2025, SB146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 18-11-302(7), concerning the definitions
used in relation to a property owner's liability with respect to property
offered to be used for recreational purposes, is amended to read as follows:
(7) “Recreational purpose” includes, but is not limited to,
without limitation any of the following or any combination thereof of any of
the following:
(A) Hunting;
(B) Fishing;
(C) Swimming;
(D) Boating;
*JLL137*
01/30/2025 8:59:52 AM JLL137

SB146
(E) Camping;
(F) Picnicking;
(G) Hiking;
(H) Pleasure driving;
(I) Nature study;
(J) Water skiing;
(K) Winter sports;
(L) Spelunking;
(M) Aviation;
(N) Rock climbing;
(O) Cycling;
(P) Mountain biking;
(Q) Horseback riding;
(R) Paddling;
(S) Skateboarding;
(T) Hoverboarding;
(U) Viewing or enjoying historical, archeological, scenic,
or scientific sites; and
(O)(V) Any other activity undertaken for exercise,
education, relaxation, or pleasure on land owned by another.
















01/30/2025 8:59:52 AM JLL137